Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1427
Autopsy; written
authorization; removal of organs; when performed.

A
written authorization for an autopsy given by the person listed in section 30-2223 having the right of disposition of the remains may, subject to section 23-1824
and when not inconsistent with any directions given by the decedent pursuant
to section 38-1426, include authorization for the removal of any specifically
named organ or organs for therapeutic or scientific purposes. Pursuant to
any such written authorization, any structure or organ may be given to the
director or to any other therapeutic service operated by any nonprofit agency
approved by the director, including, but not limited to, a teaching institution,
university, college, legally licensed hospital, nonprofit blood bank, nonprofit
artery bank, nonprofit eye bank, or nationally recognized nonprofit hormone
and pituitary program. The person or persons performing any autopsy shall
do so within a reasonable time and without delay and shall not exceed the
removal permission contained in such written authorization, and the remains
shall not be significantly altered in external appearance nor shall any portion
thereof be removed for purposes other than those expressly permitted in this
section.

Laws 1959, c. 325, § 3, p. 1188;

Laws 1959, c. 326, § 2, p. 1189;

Laws 1985, LB 130, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 560;

Laws 1999, LB 46, § 6;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1341;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 468;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 563;

Laws 2014, LB998, § 11.